Nevada, session 83, AB320.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 1 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that
access to justice and the courts of this State is of great importance
to the people of this State, and the Legislature recognizes the
interest of the courts in maintaining order and decorum in the
courtroom.
2. The Legislature therefore urges the courts of this State, for
the purpose of recognizing the diverse socioeconomic
backgrounds of the people who appear before them, not to create
policies, rules or administrative orders that unduly restrict access
to justice based on the attire of the parties, witnesses or public.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 1.7. 1. A court may not impose a penalty on a
defendant who is denied access to a courtroom solely because the
defendant is not wearing formal or professional attire.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Formal or professional attire” includes, without
limitation, suits, trousers, slacks, long pants, dress shirts, long-
sleeved shirts, suit jackets, blazers, ties, dresses, skirts, pantsuits,
dress shoes and closed-toed shoes.
(b) “Penalty” includes, without limitation:
(1) A fine or fee;
(2) Entering upon the minutes that a person failed to
appear when lawfully required in court; or
(3) The issuance of a warrant for arrest.
Secs. 2-4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. Chapter 213 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Division may, by regulation, establish a pilot program
to identify and develop employment opportunities for and provide
training on employment readiness to parolees and probationers.
2. In establishing the pilot program, the Division may
collaborate with nonprofit organizations in the community that
provide services to parolees and probationers.
Sec. 6. NRS 213.107 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.107 As used in NRS 213.107 to 213.157, inclusive, and
section 5 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Board” means the State Board of Parole Commissioners.
2. “Chief” means the Chief Parole and Probation Officer.
3. “Division” means the Division of Parole and Probation of
the Department of Public Safety.
4. “Residential confinement” means the confinement of a
person convicted of a crime to his or her place of residence under
the terms and conditions established by the Board.
5. “Responsivity factors” means characteristics of a person that
affect his or her ability to respond favorably or unfavorably to any
treatment goals.
6. “Risk and needs assessment” means a validated,
standardized actuarial tool that identifies risk factors that increase
the likelihood of a person reoffending and factors that, when
properly addressed, can reduce the likelihood of a person
reoffending.
7. “Sex offender” means any person who has been or is
convicted of a sexual offense.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
8. “Sexual offense” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179D.097.
9. “Standards” means the objective standards for granting or
revoking parole or probation which are adopted by the Board or the
Chief.
Sec. 7. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations or performing any other preparatory administrative tasks
that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)